New Mexico, session 2026, HB56.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One million dollars ($1,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the veterans' services department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to assist veterans and their families in identifying and accessing behavioral health care services. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .232753.1